Utah, session 2026, HB350.
Section 1. Section 53G-9-205.2 is amended to read:53G-9-205.2. Definitions -- Prohibited food additives -- Exceptions.(1)As used in this section:(a)"FDC" means the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetics Act, 21 C.F.R. Part 74.(b)"Public school" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-9-205.1.(c)"School day" means the same as that terms is defined in Section 53G-6-201.(d)"School food pantry" means a noncommercial program a school or LEA operates, or partners with a nonprofit organization to operate, to provide food free of charge to a student or the student's family to address food insecurity.(2)(a)Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, a A public school may not sell, donate, offer, or serve on school grounds during the school day, food that contains:(i)potassium bromate;(ii)propylparaben;(iii)FDC Blue No. 1;(iv)FDC Blue No. 2;(v)FDC Green No. 3;(vi)FDC Red No. 3;(vii)FDC Red No. 40;(viii)FDC Yellow No. 5; and(ix)FDC Yellow No. 6.(b)Except as provided in Subsection (3), a person who sells, donates, offers, or serves a consumable item during the school day shall comply with the requirements under this section.(3)(a)Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(b):(i)a student's parent may provide students with a food item described in Subsection (2)(a) during the school day;(ii)a teacher may provide students with a food item described in Subsection (2)(a) if the teacher obtains permission from the students' parents at the start of each school semester; and(iii)an individual may donate a food item described in Subsection (2)(a) to a school's food pantry;(iv)a public school may accept and distribute to a student a food item described in Subsection (2)(a) if the food item is a donated food item described in Subsection (3)(a)(iii); and(v)a person may sell a food item described in Subsection (2)(a):(A)as a concession item at a school-sponsored event or extra-curricular activity; or(B)in a vending machine.(b)This section does not apply to a charter school or school district that has 5,500 students or fewer.(b)Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, this section applies to a charter school or school district that has 5,500 students or fewer.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.